Massachusetts, session 194th, H3781.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 134, the words "five o'clock post 
meridian of the seventh calendar day" and inserting in place thereof the following words:- 
"the close of business of the tenth business day" 
SECTION 2. Section 4 of chapter 90D of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by striking out, in line 4, the words “within ten days from the” and inserting in place 
thereof the following words:- 
“prior to the close of business of the tenth business day following the”